DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) & DI-133
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

DI6Y1-01

ABS Warning Light Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

If the ECU detects trouble, it lights the ABS warning light while at the same time prohibiting ABS control. At
this time, the ECU records a DTC in memory.
Connectterminals Tcand E ’ ofthe check connectorto make the ABS warning light blink and outputthe DTC.

WIRING DIAGRAM

LHD:
ABS & BA &
TRC & VSC
Combination Meter J39 Cowl Side J/B LH ECU
2 SB - SB 12 L P-L L
C1s . - 2p 2J WA
15 SB SB 83 GAUGE 1
)
OTRO—"s 5 (€T3
— J30 B
ABS Warning Light J/C
Engine Room R/B
’
) SR
"/
6 LB 14 4
L-B SN 1G1 — 1E &
IG1 No. 1 Relay
A 15 1
J15 1E o0 OO 10
J/C AM1 No.?2 AM1 No. 1
A
L-B B
4
IG1 | |gniti B-R
o gnition T 2
%} Switch oo
AM1 FL Block
2
1 -
N T
sg LG || Battery
T \EE /
p - - F09217

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM731E)



DI-

134

DIAGNOSTICS

- ABS&VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

RHD:

ABS & BA &
TRC & VSC
Combination Meter Cowl Side J/B LH ECU
2 61 10 1 \
Ci15 SB 3l 3A WA
J30
15 LG s | GAUGE 1
)
@ C15 B 2P O~ 2H
B
ABS Warning Light
Engine Room R/B
1
1F )2 f oo
e/
6 LB 14 4
L-B Y 1G1 — 1E &
IG1 No. 1 Relay
A 15 1
J13 1E o0 OO 10
J/C AM1No.2 AM1 No. 1
A
L-B B
4
IG1 | |gniti B-R
o] gnition T 2
x Switch o0
AM? FL Block
2
1 L
N T
sg LG || Battery
T \EE /
p B B F10018
LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM731E)




DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) & DI-135
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

HINT:
Troubleshoot in accordance with the chart below for each trouble symptom.

1

ABS warning light does not light up *

ABS warning light remains on #
*': Startthe inspectionfrom step 1in case of usingthe hand -heldtesterand startfrom step 2in case of not
uésing hand -heldtester.
* : Afterinspection with step 4, startthe inspection from step 5 in case of using the hand -heldtesterand
startfrom step 6 in case of not using hand -heldtester.

1 Check operation ofthe ABS warning light.

PREPARATION:

(a) Connectthehand -heldtestertothe DLCS.

(b) Turntheignition switch ON and pushthe hand -heldtester main switch ON.
(c) Selectthe ACTIVE TEST mode onthe hand -heldtester.

CHECK:

Checkthat”’ON”and”OFF” ofthe ABS warning light can be shown on the combination meter onthe hand
held tester.

@

2 | Does the warning lights other than ABS warning lights up?

0K> Check andreplace ABS & BA & TRC & VSCECU.

meter assembly.

YES> Repair ABS warning light bulb or combination
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3ChecklG 1 No. 1 relay.

PREPARATION:
Remove IG1 No. 1 relay from engine room J/B.
2——1) CHECK:
Check continuity between each pair of terminal of IG1 No. 1
relay.
OK:
Terminals 3 and 4 Continuity
Terminals 1 and 2 Open
CHECK:
(@) Apply battery voltage between terminals 3 and 4.
(b)  Check continuity between terminals.
OK:
| Terminals 1 and 2 | Continuity
BE 1840
R15257
R15258
F00044

NG% placelG 1 No. 1 relay.

@

Checkforopencircuitin harness and connector between IG 1 No. 1 relay and combination mete¢r
(See page IN-35).
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4 | Check that the ECU connectors are securely connected to the ECU.

NO> Connect the connector to the ECU.

YES

5 | Check operation of the ABS warning light (See step 1).

OK> Checkandreplace ABS&BA & TRC &VSCECU.

6 Is DTC output?

Check DTC on page DI-4.

@

7 Check for short circuit in harness and connector between ABS warning light and ABS &
BA & TRC & VSC ECU (See page IN-35).

@

Check and repair ABS & BA & TRC & VSC
ECU.

YES> Repair circuit indicated by the output code.

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM731E)



